Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 13 CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT ACT
26-13-111. State income tax refund offset.

At any time prescribed by the department of revenue, but not less frequently than annually, the state department shall certify to the department of revenue information regarding persons who owe a child support debt to the state pursuant to section 14-14-104, C.R.S., or who owe child support arrearages as requested as a part of an enforcement action pursuant to article 5 of title 14, C.R.S., or who owe child support arrearages which are the subject of enforcement services provided pursuant to section 26-13-106.

Such information shall include the name and the social security number of the person owing the child support debt or arrearages, the amount of same, and any other identifying information required by the department of revenue.

Prior to final certification of the information specified in subsection (1) of this section to the department of revenue, the state department shall notify the obligated parent, in writing, that the state intends to refer the parent's name to the department of revenue in an attempt to offset the parent's child support debt or arrearages against the parent's state income tax refund. Such notification shall include information on the parent's right to object to the offset.

Upon notification by the department of revenue of amounts deposited with the state treasurer pursuant to section 39-21-108 (3), C.R.S., and after deduction of the fees authorized in subsection (4) of this section to be collected from applicants receiving support enforcement services pursuant to section 26-13-106 (2), the state department shall disburse such amounts to the appropriate county department for processing or for distribution to the individual receiving support enforcement services pursuant to section 26-13-106, as appropriate.

The state department shall promulgate rules and regulations, pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., establishing procedures to implement this section and may promulgate rules and regulations establishing reasonable fees to be collected from an applicant who is receiving support enforcement services provided pursuant to section 26-13-106 (2). Such fees shall not exceed the amount necessary to cover the cost of collecting overdue child support using the state tax refund offset procedure.

The home addresses and social security numbers of persons subject to the income tax refund offset, provided to the state department by the department of revenue, shall be sent to the respective delegate child support enforcement unit as defined in section 14-14-102, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 597, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1)(a) amended, p. 729, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1)(a), (3), and (4) amended, p. 798, § 32, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1606, § 11, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

Prior to its repeal in 1985, provisions concerning child support debt offsets were found in § 14-14-108.

26-13-111.5. State vendor payment offset.

At any time prescribed by the controller, but not less frequently than annually, the state department shall certify to the controller information regarding persons who owe child support debt pursuant to section 14-14-104, C.R.S., or who owe child support arrearages as requested as part of an enforcement action under article 5 of title 14, C.R.S., or who owe child support arrearages that are the subject of enforcement services provided under section 26-13-106.

Upon notification by the controller of amounts deposited with the state treasurer pursuant to section 24-30-202.4, C.R.S., the state department shall disburse such amounts to the appropriate county for processing and distribution to the federal, state, or local agency to whom the person is obligated.

The state department shall promulgate rules establishing procedures to implement this section pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

The last-known addresses and social security numbers of persons subject to the vendor payment offset, provided to the state department by the controller, shall be sent to the respective county departments or the food stamp district administered by the state department.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 941, § 3, effective July 1.

26-13-112. Child support incentive payments. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 598, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(2)(c) amended, p. 1412, § 5, effective June 8.

L. 98:

(2)(c) amended, p. 825, § 39, effective August 5.

L. 99:

(6) added, p. 1087, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 2000. (See L. 99, p. 1087.)

26-13-112.5. Child support incentive payments - report.

From federal fiscal year 2000 through federal fiscal year 2023, one hundred percent of the federal incentives received by the state shall be passed through to the county departments.

Beginning in federal fiscal year 2024, and each federal fiscal year thereafter, the decision about whether the state may retain a percentage of the federal incentives the state receives for the purposes of information technology enhancements to the automated child support enforcement system and how to use the retained amount shall be determined in accordance with the rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The percentage is calculated by determining the increase in incentives received in federal fiscal year 2024 over and above the base amount. The base amount is equal to the average of the incentives received in federal fiscal years 2018 through 2022. Any federal incentives not retained by the state shall be passed through to the county departments.

The state board shall promulgate rules:

Specifying performance measures in which incentives shall be distributed to the county departments; and

Implementing a process by which a statewide association of county human service directors and the state department determine whether to retain a percentage of the federal incentives and determine how the incentives are invested.

A county department to which a payment is made pursuant to this section shall expend the full amount of the payment to supplement, and not supplant, other funds used by the county department for any of the following purposes:

To carry out the approved state plan; or

For any activity, including cost-effective contracts, approved by the state division of child support enforcement, whether or not the expenditures for the activity are eligible for federal reimbursement, that may contribute to improving the effectiveness or efficiency of the child support program.

If federal incentives paid to any county department are greater than the county department's share of child support administrative costs, then that county department shall demonstrate how the federal incentive money is expended and contributes to the program as defined in subsection (4)(b) of this section.

All federal and state incentives paid to county departments pursuant to section 26-13-108 shall be divided and distributed to the county departments according to the distribution formula as promulgated in state rule by the state board.

The state department shall pay incentives to county departments on a quarterly basis.

Beginning July 1, 2025, and each year thereafter, the state department shall report on each project funded by the federal incentive money the state retained pursuant to subsection (2) of this section to the joint technology committee of the general assembly.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 1087, § 8, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1360), ch. 364, p. 2601, § 2, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1360, see section 1 of chapter 364, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

26-13-113. Placement in foster care automatic assignment of right.

When a child is placed in foster care pursuant to article 5 of this title or Title IV-E of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, all rights to current and accrued child support for the benefit of the child are assigned by operation of law to the state department. When placement has terminated, the assignment of rights to accrued child support shall remain in effect until foster care cost of care or maintenance costs have been reimbursed in full. Amounts collected pursuant to this section shall be distributed to the federal government, the state, and the county proportionately according to each entity's contribution.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 600, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 387, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-123), ch. 46, p. 120, § 7, effective August 10.

26-13-114. Family support registry - collection and disbursement of child support and maintenance - rules - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that it has been demonstrated that the establishment and operation of one automated central payment registry for the processing of child support, child support when combined with maintenance, and maintenance payments is beneficial to the state in the collection and enforcement of family support obligations. It is the intent of the general assembly by enacting this section to authorize the implementation of one central family support registry for the collection, receipt, and disbursement of payments with respect to:

Child support obligations for children whose custodians are receiving child support enforcement services from delegate child support enforcement units (IV-D cases);

Child support obligations for children whose custodians are not receiving child support enforcement services from delegate child support enforcement units (non-IV-D cases), if the court orders such obligations to be paid through the family support registry pursuant to this title, section 14-10-117, C.R.S., or title 19, C.R.S., or if the court order is subject to income-withholding pursuant to section 14-14-111.5, C.R.S., and if the executive director of the state department has notified the state court administrator pursuant to subsection (5) of this section that the judicial district in which the court issuing the order is situated is ready to participate in the family support registry; and

Maintenance obligations, if the court orders payments for such obligations to be paid through the family support registry pursuant to this title or section 14-10-117, C.R.S., or if the order is subject to income-withholding pursuant to section 14-14-111.5, C.R.S., and if the executive director of the state department has notified the state court administrator that the judicial district in which the court issuing the order is situated is ready to participate in the family support registry and the family support registry is ready to accept such maintenance payments.

"Family support registry" means a central registry maintained and operated by the state department acting as the child support enforcement agency that receives, processes, disburses, and maintains a record of the payment of child support, child support when combined with maintenance, maintenance, child support arrears, or child support debt made pursuant to court order or administrative order.

The child support enforcement agency is authorized to establish and maintain or contract for the establishment and maintenance of a family support registry to receive, process, and disburse support payments. Development and operation of the family support registry shall be subject to available appropriations.

In operating the family support registry, the child support enforcement agency is authorized to:

Receive, process, and disburse payments for child support, child support when combined with maintenance, maintenance, child support arrears, or child support debt;

Maintain records of any payments collected, processed, and disbursed through the family support registry;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 98, p. 759, § 10, effective July 1, 1998.)

Answer inquiries from authorized parties concerning payments processed through the family support registry;

Collect a fee for the processing of insufficient funds checks. The child support enforcement agency shall issue a notice to the originator of the second insufficient funds check received within any six-month period that no further checks will be accepted from the person and that future payments for a period of six months following the issuance of the notice shall be required to be paid by cash or certified funds. In the event that a disbursement to the obligee becomes unfunded due to insufficient funds, stop payment, or other reason, the unfunded disbursement may be recovered from the next payment. The department of human services shall ensure that provisions are available for obligors to make cash payments through their county child support enforcement units.

On and after July 1, 1998, the child support enforcement agency and the office of the state court administrator shall jointly begin implementing the family support registry in particular counties and judicial districts with respect to non-IV-D cases and orders in which payments are directed to be paid through the family support registry, as mutually agreed by the executive director and the state court administrator. The executive director of the state department shall inform the state court administrator when a particular county or judicial district is ready to implement and participate in the family support registry for non-IV-D cases. The family support registry shall be available for support orders for use by all counties and judicial districts consistent with federal law.

Upon implementation of the family support registry in a particular county or judicial district, the following procedures shall be followed:

All court orders entered or modified and all administrative orders issued pursuant to this title or title 14 or 19, C.R.S., that require payments for child support, child support when combined with maintenance, maintenance, child support arrears, or child support debt to be paid through a registry shall be made through the family support registry except as provided by section

14-14-111.5

(3)(a)(II), C.R.S.

For non-IV-D cases or orders that require payments to be made to the clerk of the court, the district court for each county and the Denver juvenile court shall send or cause to be sent a notice to redirect payments to the family support registry once the executive director of the state department has notified the state court administrator that the judicial district in which the court is situated, pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, is ready to participate in the family support registry. The notice shall be sent by first-class mail and shall state that all payments shall be made to the family support registry. The notice shall be sent to the following persons:

In non-IV-D cases in which there is an order to make the payments through a registry, any obligor who is obligated to pay child support, child support when combined with maintenance, or maintenance where the order does not already specify paying through the family support registry;

Any employer or trustee who has been withholding wages under a wage assignment pursuant to section

14-14-107

, C.R.S., as it existed prior to July 1, 1996;

Any employer or other payer of funds who has been withholding income pursuant to an income assignment pursuant to section

14-14-111

, C.R.S., as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, or section

14-14-111.5

, C.R.S.;

Any obligor or employer who receives a notice to redirect payments as specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) who fails to make the payments to the family support registry and who continues to make payments to the court or to the delegate child support enforcement unit shall be sent a second notice to redirect payments. The second notice shall be sent certified mail, return receipt requested. Such notice shall contain all of the information required to be included in the first notice to redirect payments and shall further state that the obligor or employer has failed to make the payments to the correct agency and that the obligor or employer shall redirect the payments to the family support registry at the address indicated in the notice. Failure to make payments to the family support registry after a second notice shall be grounds for filing a motion for contempt.

Any payment required to be made to the family support registry that is received by the court or by a delegate child support enforcement unit shall be forwarded to the family support registry within five working days after receipt. Any such payments forwarded shall be identified with the information specified by the family support registry, including but not limited to, the court case number, the county where the court case originated, and the name of the obligor. A copy of the notice to redirect payments described in subparagraph (I), (II), (III), or (IV) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (6) shall be mailed to the obligee and to the court in cases of a IV-D case or order, by first-class mail.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 98, p. 759, § 10, effective July 1, 1998.)

All support orders shall contain:

The amount of the payment;

The specific day or dates on which the payment is due;

The name, date of birth, residential address, and sex of the obligor, and the name and address of the employer of the obligor;

The name, date of birth, residential address, and sex of the obligee;

The name, date of birth, and sex of all dependents covered under the support order;

A statement that the parties are required to notify the family support registry, if the support order requires payments to be made through the family support registry, of any change in residential and mailing address of the obligor or obligee or of any change in address of the employer or payer of funds or any other changes that may affect the administration of the support order, including changes in employment of the obligor.

The clerk of the court shall notify the family support registry within five working days after any entry of judgment is filed in relation to any child support, child support when combined with maintenance, or maintenance case where payments are required to be paid through the family support registry, whether by order of court or verified entry of judgment, including the inclusive dates of the judgment and the judgment amount.

The judicial department and the state department shall cooperate in the transfer of the functions relating to the collection of child support and maintenance from the judicial department to the state department.

The court shall provide the following information to the family support registry, if available, in those cases in which the court orders payment to be made through the family support registry:

The date of the order;

The court case number;

The name and address of the obligor;

The name and address of the obligee; and

The name and address of the obligor's employer.

A copy of the record of payment maintained by the family support registry shall be admissible into evidence as proof of the payments made through the family support registry.

The state board shall promulgate such rules and regulations, pursuant to section 24-4-103, C.R.S., as are necessary to implement this section.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 96, p. 623, § 38, effective July 1, 1996.)

A party to a case identified by the court as one in which the party is directed to make maintenance payments through the family support registry shall pay a minimal per transaction processing fee, in an amount to be determined annually by rule of the executive director of the state department to cover the direct and indirect costs associated with processing the maintenance payment, which fee shall be paid by such person each time the maintenance payment is made through the family support registry.

The fees collected pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (13) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the family support registry fund, created pursuant to section 26-13-115.5.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 600, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 591, § 11, effective July 10.

L. 88:

(1), (4), and (5) amended, p. 636, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 90:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1407, § 2, effective June 8.

L. 94:

(1), (2), (4)(e), (5), and (9) amended, p. 2708, § 279, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(6)(b)(II), (6)(b)(III), (6)(d), and (12) amended, p. 623, § 38, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1262, § 170, effective August 7.

L. 98:

(1) to (6), IP(7), (7)(f), and (9) amended, p. 759, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1), (2), (4)(a), (5), (6)(a), (6)(b)(I), (8) and (9)(a) amended and (13) added, p. 1088, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(4)(e) amended, p. 1667, § 27, effective May 31.

L. 2008:

(7)(c), (7)(d), and (7)(e) amended, p. 1350, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(1)(b) and (1)(c) amended, (SB 11-123), ch. 46, p. 120, § 8, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

The term "custody", and related terms, has been changed in other places in the Colorado Revised Statutes to correspond with the use of the term "parental responsibilities" as described in section 14-10-124.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994; for the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996.

26-13-115. Child support enforcement agency fund created - application of interest, fees, and recovered costs. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 601, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 90:

Entire section repealed, p. 1416, § 17, effective June 8.

26-13-115.5. Family support registry fund created.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund to be known as the family support registry fund, which shall consist of any money credited thereto from the investment earnings on money deposited with the state treasurer, money accruing from collections for child support received by the family support registry, any undeliverable child support payments, and any fees collected pursuant to section 26-13-114 (13). Money in the family support registry fund shall be continuously appropriated to the state department to reimburse the family support registry for unfunded payments by obligors or for other incidental expenditures associated with the operation of the family support registry. At the end of any fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered money in the family support registry fund shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund of the state; except that any non-IV-D child support payments that are undeliverable after two years shall be considered unclaimed property for purposes of the "Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act", article 13 of title 38, and shall be reported to the administrator of the "Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act" for purposes of locating the payee. Consistent with the requirements for confidentiality of information regarding child support, the state department shall specify the amount of money that is unclaimed and provide sufficient identifying information, if available, to allow the administrator to locate the payee.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1410, § 3, effective June 8.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 763, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 723, § 8, effective May 31.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 157, § 16, effective March 27; (2) repealed, p. 673, § 6, effective May 28; entire section amended, p. 25, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 468, § 12, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

The term "custody", and related terms, has been changed in other places in the Colorado Revised Statutes to correspond with the use of the term "parental responsibilities" as described in section 14-10-124.

Cross references:

For the "Unclaimed Property Act", see article 13 of title 38.

26-13-116. Debt information made available to consumer reporting agencies - notice to noncustodial parent - fees - rules - definitions.

For purposes of this section, "consumer reporting agency" means any person which, for monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in whole or in part in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing consumer reports to third parties.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 1295, § 38, effective July 1, 1997.)

(2.5) (a) The child support enforcement agency may provide information to consumer reporting agencies regarding child support obligations pursuant to federal law.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 1295, § 38, effective July 1, 1997.)

Prior to furnishing any information pursuant to subsection (2.5) of this section, the child support enforcement agency shall provide advance notice to the obligor parent regarding the proposed release of the information to the consumer reporting agency. Such notice shall contain an explanation of the obligor parent's right to contest the accuracy of the information to be released.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 96, p. 617, § 22, effective July 1, 1996.)

The state board shall promulgate rules, pursuant to section 24-4-103, to implement this section, including but not limited to procedures for contesting the accuracy of the information listed on the notice. The rules shall be in addition to any rights that a person may have to contest a consumer reporting agency report pursuant to sections 5-18-110 to 5-18-117.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 602, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(2), (3), and (5)(b) amended, p. 256, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2.5) added, p. 2045, § 4, effective June 3.

L. 96:

(3) to (5) amended, p. 617, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(2), (2.5), (3), and (5) amended, p. 1295, § 38, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(5) amended, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1175, § 23, effective August 9.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.

26-13-117. Study of centralized system for processing child support payments. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 637, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1262, § 169, effective August 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996.

26-13-118. Lottery winnings offset.

The state department shall periodically certify to the department of revenue information regarding persons who owe a child support debt or child support costs to the state pursuant to section 14-14-104, C.R.S., or who owe child support arrearages as requested as a part of an enforcement action pursuant to article 5 of title 14, C.R.S., or who owe child support arrearages or child support costs which are the subject of enforcement services provided pursuant to section 26-13-106.

Such information shall include the social security number of the person owing the child support debt, arrearages, or child support costs, the amount of same, and any other identifying information required by the department of revenue.

Upon receiving notification from the department of revenue that a lottery winner appears among those certified by the state department pursuant to section 44-40-113, the state department shall notify the obligated parent, in writing, that the state intends to offset the parent's current monthly child support obligation, child support debt, child support arrearages, and child support costs against the parent's winnings from the state lottery. The notification shall include information on the parent's right to object to the offset and to request an administrative review pursuant to the rules of the state board of human services.

Upon notification by the department of revenue of amounts deposited with the state treasurer pursuant to section 44-40-113, and after deduction of the fees authorized in subsection (4) of this section to be collected from applicants receiving support enforcement services pursuant to section 26-13-106 (2), the state department shall disburse such amounts to the appropriate county department for processing or for distribution to the individual receiving support enforcement services pursuant to section 26-13-106, as appropriate.

The state department shall promulgate rules and regulations, pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., establishing procedures to implement this section and may promulgate rules and regulations establishing reasonable fees to be collected from an applicant who is receiving support enforcement services as provided pursuant to section 26-13-106 (2). Such fees shall not exceed the amount necessary to cover the cost of collecting overdue child support using the state lottery winnings offset procedure.

The home addresses and social security numbers of persons subject to the state lottery winnings offset provided to the state department by the department of revenue shall be sent to the respective delegate child support enforcement unit as defined in section 14-14-102, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 797, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 256, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1565, § 18, effective September 1; (1)(a) amended, p. 1607, § 12, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 2709, § 280, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1272, § 66, effective April 22.

L. 2018:

(2) and (3) amended, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 365, § 14, effective October 1; (2) and (3) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1715, § 65, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

Section 95 of chapter 274 (HB 18-1375), Session Laws of Colorado 2018, provides that the act changing this section takes effect only if HB 18-1027 becomes law. HB 18-1027 became law and took effect October 1, 2018.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

26-13-118.5. Unclaimed property offset - definitions.

The state department may enter into a memorandum of understanding with the state treasurer, acting as the administrator of unclaimed property under the "Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act", article 13 of title 38, for the purpose of offsetting against a claim for unclaimed property the amount of current child support, child support debt, retroactive child support, child support arrearages, child support costs, or child support when combined with maintenance owed by the person claiming the unclaimed property.

The state department shall notify an obligated person in writing that the state intends to offset the person's current child support, child support debt, retroactive child support, child support arrearages, child support costs, or child support when combined with maintenance against the person's claim for unclaimed property. The notification shall include information on the person's right to object to the offset and to request an administrative review.

For purposes of this section, "claim for unclaimed property" means a cash claim submitted in accordance with section 38-13-903.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 698, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(1) and (3) amended, (SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 468, § 13, effective July 1, 2020.

26-13-118.7. Gambling winnings - interception - rules.

Pursuant to section 44-33-104 (3), the state department shall periodically certify to the registry operator information regarding persons who owe a child support debt or child support costs to the state pursuant to section 14-14-104, or who owe child support arrearages requested as part of an enforcement action pursuant to article 5 of title 14, or who owe child support arrearages or child support costs that are the subject of enforcement services provided pursuant to section 26-13-106. The information shall include the social security number of the person owing the child support debt, arrearages, or child support costs, the amount owed, and the other information required by the registry operator pursuant to section 44-33-104 (6).

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until July 1, 2023.] Upon receipt from the registry operator of a payment and accompanying information pursuant to section 44-33-105 (2)(b), the state department shall notify the obligated parent in writing that the state intends to offset the parent's child support debt, child support arrearages, or child support costs against the parent's winnings from limited gaming or from pari-mutuel wagering on horse or greyhound racing. The notice shall include information on the parent's right to object to the offset and to request an administrative review pursuant to the rules of the state board.

(2)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective July 1, 2023.

]

Upon receipt from the registry operator of a payment and accompanying information pursuant to section 44-33-105 (2)(b), the state department, through the casino, sports betting operator, internet sports betting operator, racetrack, or off-track betting facility, shall notify the obligated parent in writing that the state intends to offset the parent's child support debt, child support arrearages, or child support costs against the parent's winnings from limited gaming, from sports betting, or from pari-mutuel wagering on horse or greyhound racing. The notice must include information concerning the parent's right to object to the offset and to request an administrative review pursuant to the rules of the state board.

Upon receipt of a payment from the registry operator pursuant to section 44-33-105 (2)(b), the state department shall deposit the payment with the family support registry created pursuant to section 26-13-114. After the final disposition of any administrative review requested pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the state department shall disburse the payment for processing or for distribution to the individual receiving support enforcement services pursuant to section 26-13-106, as appropriate.

The state department shall promulgate rules pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., establishing procedures to implement this section.

The state department shall send the name, address, and social security number of any person subject to the interception of gambling winnings provided by the registry operator to the respective delegate child support enforcement unit as defined in section 14-14-102 (2), C.R.S.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1137), ch. 308, p. 1662, § 13, effective September 1, 2009.)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1666, § 26, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2009:

(3) and (6) amended, (HB 09-1137), ch. 308, p. 1662, § 13, effective September 1.

L. 2018:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, (SB 18-035), ch. 15, p. 259, § 7, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (HB 22-1412), ch. 405, p. 2876, § 9, effective July 1, 2023.

26-13-119. Distribution of amounts collected.

This section shall only apply to Title IV-D cases under the federal "Social Security Act" where the delegate child support enforcement unit is providing support enforcement services pursuant to section 26-13-106 and has responsibility to collect the required support obligation for the month.

Notwithstanding any provision in the Colorado rules of civil procedure to the contrary, any amounts collected by the delegate child support enforcement agency, except for federal income tax refund offsets, shall be allocated and distributed first to satisfy the required support obligation for the month in which the collection was received, except when the payment is distributed to pay the fee required by section 26-13-106 (4). In cases where some portion of an amount collected pursuant to execution on a judgment is diverted to satisfy the required support obligation for the month in which the collection was received, the delegate child support enforcement agency shall file a partial satisfaction of judgment with the court that reflects the portion of the amount collected that is actually allocated and distributed to satisfy the judgment.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 798, § 33, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 763, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 1654, § 13, effective October 1.

26-13-120. Administrative review of child support orders. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 893, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1565, § 19, effective September 1.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1295, § 39, effective July 1.